Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Chapter 10 United States Lands

Cross references. —

As to Yellowstone park commission, see §

36-8-201

et seq.

As to Taylor Grazing Act funds generally, see §

9-4-401

et seq.

As to forest reserve funds generally, see §

9-4-501

et seq.

As to construction contracts with United States, see §

41-7-601

et seq.

Law reviews. —

For note on easements of necessity to reach public lands, see 13 Wyo. L.J. 51 (1958).

For article, “The Administration of Law in Yellowstone National Park,” see 14 Wyo. L.J. 9 (1959).

For article, “The Public Land Law Review Commission — A Challenge to the West,” see I Land & Water L. Rev. 355 (1966).

For comment, “Criminal Jurisdiction in the National Parks — A Clarification,”see II Land & Water L. Rev. 151 (1967).

For article, “The Public Land Law Review Commission — Identifying and Defining the Problems,” see II Land & Water L. Rev. 251 (1967).

For comment, “The Status of Visitors in the National Parks Located in Wyoming — Federal Liability Under Current Applicable Wyoming Law,”see II Land & Water L. Rev. 447 (1967).

For article, “Fifty Years of Rhetoric on the Range: Reframing the Debate on Public Land Management,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 339 (1997).

For article, “The Bureau of Land Management: A Half-Century of Challenges and Change,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 345 (1997).

For article, “The Rise and Fall of Grazing Reform,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 413 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

63C Am. Jur. 2d Public Lands §§ 38, 39, 65, 66; 72 Am. Jur. 2d States, Territories and Dependencies §§ 64 to 68; 77 Am. Jur. 2d United States §§ 32 to 40.

73A C.J.S. Public Lands §§ 26 to 166.